Washington statutes.
RCW 11.110.110

Order to appear—Effect—Enforcement—Appellate review.

When the attorney general requires the attendance of any person, as provided in RCW 11.110.100, he or she shall issue an order setting forth the time when and the place where attendance is required and shall cause the same to be delivered to or sent by registered mail to the person at least fourteen days before the date fixed for attendance. Such order shall have the same force and effect as a subpoena, and, upon application of the attorney general, obedience to the order may be enforced by any superior court judge in the county where the person receiving it resides or is found, in the same manner as though the notice were a subpoena. The court, after hearing, for good cause, and upon application of any person aggrieved by the order, shall have the right to alter, amend, revise, suspend, or postpone all or any part of its provisions. In any case where the order is not enforced by the court according to its terms, the reasons for the court's actions shall be clearly stated in the record, and shall be subject to review by the supreme court or the court of appeals.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2094; 1988 c 202 s 20; 1985 c 30 s 124. Prior: 1984 c 149 s 157; 1971 c 81 s 64; 1967 ex.s. c 53 s 11. Formerly RCW 19.10.110.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Writ procedure superseded by RAP 2.1(b), 2.2, 18.22.

Severability—1988 c 202: See note following RCW 2.24.050.

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.

Severability—Effective dates—1984 c 149: See notes following RCW 11.02.005.